Utah statutes.
13-43-205.   Advisory opinion.

A local government, private entity, or a potentially aggrieved person may, in accordance with Section 13-43-206, request a written advisory opinion:

(1)  from a neutral third party to determine compliance with:

(a)  Section 10-9a-505.5 and Sections 10-9a-507 through 10-9a-511;

(b)  Section 17-27a-505.5 and Sections 17-27a-506 through 17-27a-510; and

(c)  Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act; and

(2) (a)  at any time before a final decision on a land use application by a local appeal authority under Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act, or Section 10-9a-708 or 17-27a-708;

(b)  at any time before the deadline for filing an appeal with the district court under Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act, or Section 10-9a-801 or 17-27a-801, if no local appeal authority is designated to hear the issue that is the subject of the request for an advisory opinion; or

(c)  at any time prior to the enactment of an impact fee, if the request for an advisory opinion is a request to review and comment on a proposed impact fee facilities plan or a proposed impact fee analysis as defined in Section 11-36a-102.



Amended by Chapter 200, 2013 General Session

